src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-msc-iba_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - džaaniba : #  o-stem
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: džaaniba
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: džaanibos
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: džaaniboske
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: džaanibosta
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: [džaanibossa, džaanibosha]
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: džaanibosko
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [džaaniboskiiro, džaaniboskiiri, džaaniboskiire]
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: džaanibi
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: džaanibon
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: džaanibonge
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: džaanibonna
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: džaanibonsa
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: džaanibongo
    džaaniba+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [džaanibongiiro, džaanibongiiri, džaanibongiire]
